Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-715
Members; voting rights.

Each member present shall be entitled to one, and only one, vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of members.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 15, p. 208;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-815;

R.S.1943, § 70-715.